North Dakota, session 69, HB1563.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - TRIBAL LAND TAXATION. During the
2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall consider studying tribal land taxation issues related
to taxation of land owned by enrolled tribal members who reside within the boundaries of any tribal
reservation in this state. The study may include analysis of federal law, judicial decisions concerning
tribal taxation authority, state property tax exemptions related to property of Native Americans, and the
interaction between tribal sovereignty and state law. The legislative management shall report its findings
and recommendations, together with any legislation required to implement the recommendations, to the
seventieth legislative assembly.

H. B. NO. 1563 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1563.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 1 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 1 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State